Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5692.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 73. (1) The drain commissioner shall secure from a professional engineer, plans, specifications, and an estimate of cost a cost estimate of the proposed drain and descriptions of the lands or rights of way needed for the proposed drain. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, not later than 7 days after the drain commissioner receives the plans, specifications, and cost estimate from the professional engineer under subsection (1), the drain commissioner shall send by first-class mail a letter containing a copy of the professional engineer's cost estimate to each freeholder in the drainage district. (3) Not later than 21 days after a freeholder receives a letter from the drain commissioner as described under subsection (2), a freeholder may withdraw the freeholder's support of the petition underlying the proposed drain by notifying the drain commissioner in writing of the freeholder's withdrawal. (4) If a sufficient number of freeholders withdraw support of the petition underlying the proposed drain so that the petition no longer has a level of support needed under section 71, another petition for the proposed drain must not be filed for at least 1 year after the filing date of the petition underlying the proposed drain. (5) In approving the route of the drain proposed drain's route as furnished provided by the engineers professional engineer, the drain commissioner shall is not be limited to that the route described in the petition or in the first order of determination, if the a new route is more efficient and serviceable. (6) The drain commissioner shall endeavor to secure from the owners of each parcel or tract of land to be traversed or damaged by the proposed drain or drains an easement or release of right of way and all related damages. on account thereof. Sec. 125. (1) At such meeting, the respective drain commissioners shall hear the proofs and allegations offered and shall reconsider and review the descriptions of land in that county forming a part of the drainage district, the apportionment of benefits, and define and equalize the same as may seem just and equitable. justly and equitably. The persons entitled to appear and offer proof may appeal from such the review and the manner of taking such the appeal shall must be as prescribed in chapter 7, of this act, being sections 151 to 161, inclusive. (2) Bids shall must be received and computation of the total cost of the proposed drain shall must be made, as hereinafter provided, before the time set for review of the apportionment, and such computation shall must be open to inspection at the time of review. If such the computation shall not cannot be completed before the day of review, such the review may be adjourned from time to time, not more than 20 days in all to allow for the completion of such the computation, or a new hearing may be called with like notice by publication, posting and service at least not less than 10 days before such the hearing. If for any reason the contracts on which such the computation was based shall not be are not executed and new contracts shall be are let at a higher price, a corrected computation shall must be made and a new review held with like notice. (3) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, not later than 7 days after the drain commissioners' receipt of the computation of the total cost of the proposed drain under subsection (2), the drain commissioners shall send by first-class mail a letter containing a copy of the computation to each freeholder in the drainage district. (4) Not later than 21 days after a freeholder receives a letter from the drain commissioners as described in subsection (3), a freeholder may withdraw the freeholder's support of the petition underlying the proposed drain by notifying the drain commissioner in writing of the freeholder's withdrawal. (5) If a sufficient number of freeholders withdraw the freeholders' support of the petition underlying the proposed drain so that the petition no longer has a level of support needed under section 121, another petition for the proposed drain must not be filed for at least 1 year after the filing date of the petition underlying the proposed drain.